Massachusetts, session 194th, H2085.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 26 of Chapter 149 is hereby amended by adding at the end:
For projects over one million dollars, the total hours of employees, by trade, receiving an
hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the project, employed by the contractor or
a subcontractor and subject to the prevailing wage, shall be performed by apprentices in bona
fide apprentice training programs as provided in sections 11H and 11I of chapter 23 of the
General Laws which are approved by the division of apprentice training in the executive office
of labor and workforce development and in compliance with apprentice ratios established by any
trades license board.
Six months after the passage of this act 5% of the hours shall be performed by
apprentices.
One year after 10%
of 3

Two years after 15%
Section 6 of Chapter 149 A shall be amended by adding a new section:
(f) For projects over one million dollars, the total hours of employees, by trade, receiving
an hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the project, employed by the contractor
or a subcontractor and subject to the prevailing wage, shall be performed by apprentices in bona
fide apprentice training programs as provided in sections 11H and 11I of chapter 23 of the
General Laws which are approved by the division of apprentice training in the executive office
of labor and workforce development and in compliance with apprentice ratios established by any
trades license board.
Six months after the passage of this act 5% of the hours shall be performed by
apprentices.
One year after 10%
Two years after 15%
Chapter 30 Section 39m is hereby amended by adding a new section:
(f) For projects over one million dollars, the total hours of employees, by trade, receiving
an hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the project, employed by the contractor
or a subcontractor and subject to the prevailing wage, shall be performed by apprentices in bona
fide apprentice training programs as provided in sections 11H and 11I of chapter 23 of the
General Laws which are approved by the division of apprentice training in the executive office
of labor and workforce development and in compliance with apprentice ratios established by any
trades license board.
of 3

Six months after the passage of this act 5% of the hours shall be performed by
apprentices.
One year after 10%
Two years after 15%
of 3